src/numeral-sma-lex.txt
LEXICON NUMTAGe ! akte:akt
+Num+Sg+Nom:e FINAL1 ;
+Num+Sg+Acc:%>em FINAL1 ;
+Num+Sg+Gen:%>en FINAL1 ;
+Num+Sg+Ill:%>ese FINAL1 ;
+Num+Sg+Ine:%>esne FINAL1 ;
 +Num+Sg+Ine+Attr:%>ene # ; !XXX Attr forms
 +Num+Sg+Ela+Attr:%>ede # ; !XXX Attr forms
+Num+Sg+Ela:%>este FINAL1 ;
+Num+Sg+Com:%>ine FINAL1 ;
+Num+Ess:%>ine FINAL1 ;
+Num+Pl+Nom:%>h FINAL1 ;
+Num+Pl+Acc:%>ide FINAL1 ;
+Num+Pl+Gen:%>i FINAL1 ;
+Num+Pl+Ill:%>ide FINAL1 ;
+Num+Pl+Ine:%>ine FINAL1 ;
+Num+Pl+Ela:%>ijste FINAL1 ;
+Num+Pl+Com:%>igujmie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON NUMTAGie !njieljie:njielj
+Num+Sg+Acc:ie%>m    FINAL1 ;
+Num+Sg+Gen:ie%>n    FINAL1 ;
+Num+Sg+Ill+Uml:%>%^1UMLan   FINAL1 ;
+Num+Sg+Ine:%>esne  FINAL1 ;
+Num+Sg+Ine+Attr:%>ene  # ;
+Num+Sg+Ela+Attr:%>ede  # ;
+Num+Sg+Ela:%>este  FINAL1 ;
+Num+Sg+Com:%>ine FINAL1 ;
+Num+Ess:%>ine    FINAL1 ;
+Num+Pl+Nom:ie%>h  FINAL1 ;
+Num+Pl+Acc:%>ide FINAL1 ;
+Num+Pl+Gen:ie%>j  FINAL1 ;
+Num+Pl+Ill:%>ide FINAL1 ;
+Num+Pl+Ine:%>ine FINAL1 ;
 +Num+Pl+Ela:%>ijste   FINAL1 ; !
+Num+Pl+Com:ie%>jgujmie  FINAL1 ;


LEXICON LUHKIEF
luhkie+Num+Sg+Nom:luhkie FINAL1 ;
luhkie:luhk NUMTAGie ;
luhkie# AKTEF ;
luhkie# 2TO9F ;
låhkede+A+Ord:låhkad ORDTAGODD ;
låhkesh:låhkas COLLTAG ;


LEXICON LUHKIE-
luhkie# AKTEF ;
luhkie# 2TO9F ;
låhkede+A+Ord:låhkad ORDTAGODD ;
låhkesh:låhkas COLLTAG ;

! Ordinal numbers
! ---------------

LEXICON MUBPIE
  +Sg+Nom:ie                  FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Acc:ie%>m               FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Gen:ie%>n               FINAL1 ;
! +Sg+Ill:%>an                FINAL1 ; !SUB - is this possible? IllSg without Uml in -ie?
  +Sg+Ill+Uml:%>%^1UMLan      FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Ine:e%>sne              FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Ine+Attr:e%>ne # ;
  +Sg+Ela+Attr:e%>de              # ;
  +Sg+Ela:e%>ste              FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Com:%>ine               FINAL1 ;
  +Sg+Com+Uml:%>%^iUMLine     FINAL1 ;
  +Pl+Nom:ie%>h               FINAL1 ;
  +Pl+Acc:%>ide               FINAL1 ;
  +Pl+Acc+Uml:%>%^iUMLide     FINAL1 ;
  +Pl+Gen:ie%>j               FINAL1 ;
  +Pl+Gen+Uml:%>%^iUMLi       FINAL1 ;
  +Pl+Ill:%>ide               FINAL1 ;
  +Pl+Ill+Uml:%>%^iUMLide     FINAL1 ;
  +Pl+Ine:%>ine               FINAL1 ;
  +Pl+Ine+Uml:%>%^iUMLine     FINAL1 ;
  +Pl+Ela:%>ijste             FINAL1 ;
  +Pl+Ela+Uml:%>%^iUMLijste   FINAL1 ;
  +Pl+Com:ie%>jgujmie         FINAL1 ;
  +Pl+Com+Uml:%>%^iUMLigujmie FINAL1 ;
  +Ess:%>ine                  FINAL1 ;
  +Ess+Uml:%>%^iUMLine        FINAL1 ;


LEXICON ORDTAGODD
+Sg+Nom:e%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Acc:e%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Gen:e%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
+Sg+Ine+Attr:%>inie  # ;
+Sg+Ela+Attr:%>ihtie  # ;
+Sg+Ine:%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ela:%>istie           FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Com:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Nom:%>%^DISIMPh       FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Acc:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPi       FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ill:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ine:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ela:%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>%^DISIMPigyjmie FINAL1 ; !
+Ess:%>inie          FINAL1 ;

LEXICON ORDTAGEVEN
+Sg+Nom:e FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Acc:%>em FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Gen:%>en FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ill:%>ese FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ine:%>esne FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ine+Attr:%>ene # ;
+Sg+Ela+Attr:%>ede # ;
+Sg+Ela:%>este FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Com:%>ine FINAL1 ;
+Ess:%>ine FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Nom:%>h FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Acc:%>ide FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Gen:%>i FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ill:%>ide FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ine:%>ine FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Ela:%>ijste FINAL1 ; !
+Pl+Com:%>ijgujmie FINAL1 ; 
 +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>igyjmie  FINAL1 ; !


 
! Collection numbers
! ---------------



LEXICON COLLTAG
+Num+Coll+Pl+Nom:%>%^DISIMPh       FINAL1 ;
+Num+Coll+Pl+Acc:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
+Num+Coll+Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPi       FINAL1 ;
+Num+Coll+Pl+Ill:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
+Num+Coll+Pl+Ine:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
+Num+Coll+Pl+Ela:%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
+Num+Coll+Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Num+Coll+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>%^DISIMPigyjmie FINAL1 ; !
+Num+Coll+Ess:%>inie          FINAL1 ;

! Arabic numerals
! ---------------



LEXICON NUM-PREFIXES                         !^C^
 §+Use/Circ:§ ARABIC;   ! §24                                    !
 §§+Use/Circ:§§ ARABIC;  ! §§24                                   !
 §% +Use/Circ:§%  ARABIC; ! § 24                                   !
 §§% +Use/Circ:§§%  ARABIC; ! §§ 24                                  !
 %-+Use/Circ:%- ARABIC;  ! -24                                    !
 %‒+Use/Circ:%‒ ARABIC;  ! -24 U
 %–+Use/Circ:%– ARABIC;  ! -24 U
 %—+Use/Circ:%— ARABIC;  ! -24 U
 %―+Use/Circ:%― ARABIC;  ! -24 U
 %-% +Use/Circ:%-%  ARABIC;! - 24                                  !
 %‒% +Use/Circ:%‒%  ARABIC;! - 24 2012                             !
 %–% +Use/Circ:%–%  ARABIC;! - 24 2013                             !
 %—% +Use/Circ:%—%  ARABIC;! - 24 2014                             !
 %―% +Use/Circ:%―%  ARABIC;! - 24 2015                             !
 %*+Use/Circ:%* ARABIC;  ! *24                                    !
 %$+Use/Circ:%$ ARABIC;  ! $24  ! And the Euro?                   !
 %<+Use/Circ:%< ARABIC;  ! <24                                    !
 %>+Use/Circ:%>7    ARABIC ;  ! >24                                !
 %.+Use/Circ:%. ARABIC;  ! s.24                                  !
! %+%     ARABIC ;! <plus> 24                                  !^C^
! %+    ARABIC ; ! <plus>24 ! out bec. of %<plus>:0 in twol file   !^C^
! If lack of analysis for +34 etc becomes a problem, we will need
! a new border symbol in twol instead of +.



LEXICON ARABIC  !^C^
< [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] >  ARABICLOOP ; !^C^

LEXICON ARABICLOOP      !^C^
 +Use/Circ: ARABIC ;        !
 %-+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:%- ARABIC;          ! 1-2    multipart numbers         !                 !
 %.%-+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:%.%- ARABIC;          ! 1.-2   multipart numbers           !                 !
 %-% +Use/Sub+Use/Circ:%-%  ARABIC;          ! 1- 2   multipart numbers        !                 !
 % %-+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:% %- ARABIC;          ! 1 -2   multipart numbers        !                 !
 % %-% +Use/Sub+Use/Circ:% %-%  ARABIC;          ! 1 - 2  multipart numbers        !                 !
 % %-%-% +Use/Sub+Use/Circ:% %-%-%  ARABIC;          ! 1 -- 2 multipart numbers       !                  !
 % %-+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:% %- ARABICDELIMITER; ! 1 -    multipart numbers   - "1 - :s" - do we find it?  !!
 % %-%-+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:% %-%- ARABICDELIMITER; ! 1 --   multipart numbers        !                 !
 %.+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:%. ARABIC;                                            !                 !
 %,+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:%, ARABIC;                                            !                 !
 %+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:      ARABIC ;                                            !                 !
 % +Use/Sub+Use/Circ:%  ARABIC;    ! Allowing for "23 500".                !                 !
 +Use/Circ: ARABIC ;    ! Allowing for "23 500" w/nbsp (init char is alt-space)         !
 %/+Use/Circ:%/ ARABIC;    ! 24/12                                                         !
 %/% +Use/Circ:%/%  ARABIC;    ! 24/ 12                                                        !
 % %/+Use/Circ:% %/ ARABIC;    ! 24 /12                                                        !
 +A+Ord+Use/Circ:%.   # ;                                                                     !
 ,%-+Num+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:,%-       ARABICCASE ;      ! 10,-                                          ! !
 ,%-+Num+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:.%-       ARABICCASE ;      ! 10.- It is wrong, but written.                ! !
 %%+Num+Nom+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:%%     ARABICDELIMITER ; ! 50%. It is wrong, but 75 % of us write "75%". ! !
 % %%+Num+Nom+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:% %% ARABICDELIMITER ; ! the correct ones as well... 50 % etc.         ! !
 +Num+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:             ARABICDELIMITER ; ! list of number-case delimiters                ! !


LEXICON ARABICDELIMITER ! blank + 3 delim, what does the lg counc prefer? !SUB !^C^
 +Use/Sub+Use/Circ: ARABICCASE ; ! This is the 1984s case.     !                       !
 +Use/Sub+Use/Circ:%-   ARABICCASE ; ! This is the 1984-s case.   !                       !



LEXICON ARABICCASE                      !SUB              !^C^
 +Nom+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:f   # ;     ! s. 123f.          !                   !
 +Nom+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:ff   # ;     ! s. 123ff.        !                   !
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:b # ;     ! § 123b         !                   !
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:c # ;     ! § 123c         !                   !
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:d # ;     ! § 123d         !                   !
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:e # ;     ! § 123e         !                   !
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:  # ;                        !                  !

! The Roman numerals !
! ------------------ !

LEXICON ROMAN                                !^C^
 +Use/Circ: ROM-THOUSAND ;                             !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-HUNDRED ;                             !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-TEN ;                                 !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-ONE ;                                 !

LEXICON ROM-THOUSAND                          !^C^
 M+Use/Circ:M ROM-THOUSAND-TAG;                     !
 MM+Use/Circ:MM ROM-THOUSAND-TAG;                     !
 MMM+Use/Circ:MMM ROM-THOUSAND-TAG;                     !
 MMMM+Use/Circ:MMMM ROM-THOUSAND-TAG;                 !
 MMMMM+Use/Circ:MMMMM ROM-THOUSAND-TAG;                 !

LEXICON ROM-THOUSAND-TAG                    !^C^
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;                             !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-HUNDRED ;                             !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-TEN ;!
 +Use/Circ: ROM-ONE ;!
 +Use/Circ: ROM-SPLIT ;                             !

LEXICON ROM-HUNDRED                            !^C^
 C+Use/Circ:C ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;                     !
 CC+Use/Circ:CC ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;                     !
 CCC+Use/Circ:CCC ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;                     !
 CD+Use/Circ:CD ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;                     !
 D+Use/Circ:D ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;                     !
 DC+Use/Circ:DC ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;                     !
 DCC+Use/Circ:DCC ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;                     !
 DCCC+Use/Circ:DCCC ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;                     !
 CM+Use/Circ:CM ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;                     !

LEXICON ROM-HUNDRED-TAG                        !^C^
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;                             !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-TEN ;                                 !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-ONE ;!
 +Use/Circ: ROM-SPLIT ;                             !

LEXICON ROM-TEN                                !^C^
 X+Use/Circ:X ROM-TEN-TAG;                         !
 XX+Use/Circ:XX ROM-TEN-TAG;                         !
 XXX+Use/Circ:XXX ROM-TEN-TAG;                         !
 XL+Use/Circ:XL ROM-TEN-TAG;                         !
 L+Use/Circ:L ROM-TEN-TAG;                         !
 LX+Use/Circ:LX ROM-TEN-TAG;                         !
 LXX+Use/Circ:LXX ROM-TEN-TAG;                         !
 LXXX+Use/Circ:LXXX ROM-TEN-TAG;                         !
 XC+Use/Circ:XC ROM-TEN-TAG;                         !

LEXICON ROM-TEN-TAG                            !^C^
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;                             !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-ONE ;                                 !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-SPLIT ;                             !

LEXICON ROM-ONE                                !^C^
 I+Use/Circ:I ROM-ONE-TAG;                         !
 II+Use/Circ:II ROM-ONE-TAG;                         !
 III+Use/Circ:III ROM-ONE-TAG;                         !
 IV+Use/Circ:IV ROM-ONE-TAG;                         !
 V+Use/Circ:V ROM-ONE-TAG;                         !
 VI+Use/Circ:VI ROM-ONE-TAG;                         !
 VII+Use/Circ:VII ROM-ONE-TAG;                         !
 VIII+Use/Circ:VIII ROM-ONE-TAG;                         !
 IX+Use/Circ:IX ROM-ONE-TAG;                         !
